Tennessee, session 114, SB0991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 3, Chapter 1, is amended by adding the
following language as a new part:
3-1-301. The general assembly shall convene for a September session on the
Tuesday immediately following Labor Day in each odd-numbered year and shall adjourn
no later than September 30 of the same year.
3-1-302. At the conclusion of the first annual session of each general assembly,
the adjournment resolution must provide that the general assembly will reconvene at
twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central daylight time (CDT) on the Tuesday immediately
following Labor Day in September of each odd-numbered year.
3-1-303.
(a) Notwithstanding any rule of the senate or house of representatives to
the contrary, this part governs the biennial September sessions of the general
assembly.
(b) All procedural provisions of this title and all rules of the senate and
house of representatives not inconsistent with this part are applicable to biennial
September sessions of the general assembly.
(c) The committee on rules for each house shall meet prior to the
Thursday following Labor Day in September of each odd-numbered year to
SB0991
002650
- 1 -

consider additional rule amendments and suspensions necessary for the
effective and efficient operation of the September session.
(d) The September session must be funded through the existing budget
for the general assembly's legislative session.
3-1-304.
(a) During the September session, the general assembly may consider
the following:
(1) All bills and resolutions filed prior to adjournment of the first
annual session of the general assembly;
(2) Ninety-nine (99) bills and resolutions filed for the September
session of the general assembly in accordance with subsection (b); and
(3) Other matters deemed appropriate and necessary by the
general assembly, including, but not limited to, bills and resolutions
excluded from the limitation imposed in subdivision (a)(2) and repassage
of bills and resolutions over an executive veto.
(b)
(1) For the purposes of this section, "ninety-nine (99) bills and
resolutions" does not include:
(A) General bills with local application and private acts;
(B) Resolutions that are memorializing or congratulatory in
nature and are not referred to a standing committee;
(C) Resolutions that are procedural in nature and are not
referred to a standing committee; and
(D) Supplemental appropriations bills, bond bills, index
bills, and bills that contain the following language in their caption:
- 2 - 002650

Relative to statutory revisions required for implementation
of the supplemental appropriations act.
(2)
(A) The ninety-nine (99) bills and resolutions for the
September session of the general assembly must be pre-filed for
introduction by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central daylight time
(CDT) on the third Thursday in August prior to the September
session. Each member of the house of representatives may file
one (1) bill or resolution and each member of the senate may file
up to three (3) bills or resolutions. Bills and resolutions introduced
for the September session may be acted upon during the
September session or during the second annual session of the
general assembly beginning in January of the following year.
(B) Bills described in subdivision (b)(1)(D) must be pre-
filed for introduction by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central daylight
time (CDT) on the third Thursday in August prior to the September
session.
(C) Bills and resolutions described in subdivisions
(b)(1)(A)-(C) may be filed at any time prior to the conclusion of the
September session.
(D) No bills or resolutions required to be pre-filed in
accordance with subdivisions (b)(2)(A) or (B) may be introduced
through the delayed bills committee of either house.
- 3 - 002650

3-1-305. For purposes of appointments and confirmations of any person to a
board, commission, or other entity, the September session of the general assembly will
not be considered an annual legislative session or a regular session.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-310, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) As used in this section, "general assembly session period" means the period
from:
(1) The convening of the general assembly in organizational session to
the earlier of the last day of regular session or June 1, in odd years;
(2) The convening of the general assembly in regular session to the
earlier of May 15 or the conclusion of the annual session in even years; and
(3) The convening of the general assembly in any extraordinary or
September session through the conclusion of such extraordinary or September
session.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-310(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
Except as provided in subdivisions (a)(2) and (3), during the general assembly
session period, a member of the general assembly or a member's campaign committee
or the governor or the governor's campaign committee shall not conduct a fundraiser or
solicit or accept contributions for the benefit of the caucus, any caucus member, or
member or candidate of the general assembly or governor.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-310(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting the following:
During the general assembly session period, a political campaign committee
controlled by a political party on the national, state, or local level, or controlled by a
- 4 - 002650

caucus of such political party established by members of either house of the general
assembly, or established or controlled by any member of the general assembly, that
makes contributions to a candidate for the general assembly or governor for election or
to defray the expenses of such person's office shall not conduct a fundraiser or solicit or
accept contributions for the benefit of the caucus, any caucus member, or candidate for
the general assembly or governor.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 002650